Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 11. Bonds to Finance Economic Development Projects.
§ 57-10-413.
Job development assessment fee [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

[In cases involving an economic development project for which the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation has issued bonds for the purpose of financing the approved costs of such project prior to July 1, 1994, this section shall read as follows:]

The approved company may require that each employee whose gross wages are equivalent to Five Dollars ($5.00) or more per hour, as a condition of employment, agrees to pay a job development assessment fee not to exceed a certain percentage of the gross wages of each such employee whose job was created as a result of the economic development project, for the purpose of retiring the bonds which fund the economic development project or other indebtedness. The job development assessment fee shall not exceed the following percentages of the gross wages of the employee:

Two percent (2%), if the gross wages of the employee are equivalent to Five Dollars ($5.00) or more per hour but less than Seven Dollars ($7.00) per hour;

Four percent (4%), if the gross wages of the employee are equivalent to Seven Dollars ($7.00) or more per hour but less than Nine Dollars ($9.00) per hour; and

Six percent (6%), if the gross wages of the employee are equivalent to Nine Dollars ($9.00) or more per hour.

Each employee so assessed shall be entitled to credits against Mississippi income taxes as provided in Section 27-7-22.3.

If an approved company shall elect to impose the assessment as a condition of employment, it shall deduct the assessment from each paycheck of each employee.

Any approved company collecting an assessment as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall make its payroll books and records available to the corporation at such reasonable times as the corporation shall request and shall file with the corporation documentation respecting the assessment as the corporation may require.

Any assessment of the wages of employees of an approved company in connection with their employment at an economic development project under subsection (1) of this section shall lapse on the date the bonds are retired.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 7; Laws, 1994, ch. 525, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-413.
Job development assessment fee [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

[In cases involving an economic development project for which the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation has not issued bonds for the purpose of financing the approved costs of such project prior to July 1, 1994, but has issued bonds for such project prior to July 1, 1997, or in cases involving an economic development project which has been induced by a resolution of the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation that has been filed with the State Tax Commission prior to July 1, 1997, this section shall read as follows: ]

Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (6) of this section, the approved company may require that each employee whose gross wages are equivalent to Five Dollars ($5.00) or more per hour, as a condition of employment, agrees to pay a job development assessment fee not to exceed a certain percentage of the gross wages of each such employee whose job was created as a result of the economic development project, for the purpose of retiring the bonds which fund the economic development project or other indebtedness. The job development assessment fee shall not exceed the following percentages of the gross wages of the employee:

Two percent (2%), if the gross wages of the employee are equivalent to Five Dollars ($5.00) or more per hour but less than Seven Dollars ($7.00) per hour;

Four percent (4%), if the gross wages of the employee are equivalent to Seven Dollars ($7.00) or more per hour but less than Nine Dollars ($9.00) per hour; and

Six percent (6%), if the gross wages of the employee are equivalent to Nine Dollars ($9.00) or more per hour.

Each employee so assessed shall be entitled to credits against Mississippi income taxes as provided in Section 27-7-22.3.

If an approved company shall elect to impose the assessment as a condition of employment, it shall deduct the assessment from each paycheck of each employee.

Any approved company collecting an assessment as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall make its payroll books and records available to the corporation at such reasonable times as the corporation shall request and shall file with the corporation documentation respecting the assessment as the corporation may require.

Any assessment of the wages of employees of an approved company in connection with their employment at an economic development project under subsection (1) of this section shall lapse on the date the bonds are retired.

If an eligible company closes a facility in this state and becomes an approved company under the provisions of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-449, only those jobs created in excess of those that existed at the closed facility at the time of the closure shall be eligible for the imposition of the job development assessment fee. The Mississippi Business Finance Corporation shall promulgate rules and regulations to govern the determination of the number of jobs upon which the job development assessment fee may be imposed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 7; Laws, 1994, ch. 525, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-415.
Payment of revenue bonds; security [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

Every issue of bonds under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall be payable solely out of any revenues of the corporation as provided in Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445. The bonds additionally may be secured by a pledge of any grant, contribution or guarantee from the federal government or any person or a pledge by the corporation of any revenues from any source.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-417.
Bonds as limited obligation of corporation; personal liability of member or officer of corporate board [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

The bonds issued by the corporation under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall be limited obligations of the corporation and shall not constitute a debt, liability or general obligation of the state or any political subdivision thereof (other than the corporation), or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or any political subdivision thereof (other than the corporation), but shall be payable solely as provided by the corporation under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445. No member or officer of the board of directors of the corporation nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance thereof. Each bond issued under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall contain on the face thereof a statement that neither the state, nor any other political subdivision thereof, shall be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon or other costs incident thereto except from the revenue or money pledged by the corporation and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of, or the interest on, such bond.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-419.
Issuance of bonds generally; use of proceeds; interim receipts, temporary certificates, replacement certificates [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

The corporation may issue in its own name, from time to time, for the purpose of financing the approved costs of an economic development project, its bonds and may pledge for the payment thereof funds derived in respect of any financing agreement or other arrangement entered into by the corporation and an approved company under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445.

In anticipation of the issuance of bonds, the corporation may provide for the issuance, at one time or from time to time, of bond anticipation notes. The principal of and the interest on the notes shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided for the payment. Any notes may be made payable from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes; or, if bond or renewal note proceeds are not available, the notes may be paid from any available revenues or assets of the corporation.

The bonds issued under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall be authorized by a resolution of the corporation, shall bear such date or dates, and shall mature at such time or times as such resolution may provide, except that no bond shall mature more than twenty-five (25) years from the date of issue. Bonds which are not subject to taxation shall bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denominations, be in such form, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption, including redemption before maturity, as such resolution may provide. Except as expressly provided otherwise in Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, the provisions of other laws of the state relating to the issuance of revenue bonds shall not apply to bonds issued by the corporation. As to bonds issued hereunder and designated as taxable bonds by the corporation, any immunity to taxation by the United States government of interest on such bonds or notes is hereby waived. Bonds of the corporation may be sold by the corporation at public or private sale, from time to time, and at such price or prices as the corporation shall determine.

The proceeds of any bonds shall be used solely for the purposes for which issued and shall be disbursed in the manner and under the restrictions, if any, that the corporation may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in a trust indenture securing the same.

The principal and interest on the bonds issued by the corporation shall be payable solely and only from proceeds derived under a financing agreement and shall be secured solely by the economic development project, the proceeds of the financing agreement, and such other assets as may be available, but not including revenues of the state.

Before the preparation of definitive certificates evidencing the bonds, the corporation may issue, under like restrictions, interim receipts or temporary certificates, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive certificates when the certificates have been executed and are available for delivery. The corporation may also provide for the replacement of any certificates which become mutilated or are destroyed or lost.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-421.
Additional provisions in bond issue resolution [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

In addition to the requirements provided for in Section 57-10-419, any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 may contain provisions as to:

The setting aside of reserves or sinking funds and the regulations and disposition thereof;

Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding or other bonds;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any of the proceedings under which the bonds are being issued may be amended or abrogated, the number or percentage of bondholders who or which must consent thereto, and the manner in which the consent may be given;

The vesting in a trustee or trustees of such property, rights, powers and duties in trust as the company may determine, and limiting or abrogating the right of bondholders to appoint a trustee or limiting the rights, powers and duties of the trustee;

Defining the act or omissions to act which shall constitute a default and the obligations or duties of the corporation to the holders of the bonds, and providing for the rights and remedies of the holders of the bonds in the event of default, which rights and remedies may include the general laws of the state and other provisions of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445; or

Any other matter, of like or different character, which in any way affects the security or protection of the holders of the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-423.
Pledge made by corporation; recording of resolution or other instrument [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

Any pledge made by the corporation shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge was made. The revenues or properties so pledged and thereafter received by the corporation shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the corporation, irrespective of whether the parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-425.
Purchase of bonds by corporation [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

The corporation, subject to the provisions in proceedings relating to outstanding bonds as may then exist, may purchase bonds out of any funds available therefor, which shall thereupon be canceled, at any reasonable price which, if the bonds are then redeemable, shall not exceed the redemption price (and premium, if any) then applicable plus accrued interest to the redemption date thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-427.
Trust indentures [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

The bonds may be secured by an indenture by and between the corporation and a corporate trustee which may be any bank or other corporation having the power of a trust company or any trust company within or without this state. Such indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the corporation in relation to the exercise of its powers and the custody, safekeeping and application of all money. The corporation may provide by the indenture for the payment of the proceeds of the bonds and revenues to the trustee under the indenture or other depository, and for the method of disbursement thereof, with such safeguards and restrictions as the corporation may determine. If the bonds shall be secured by an indenture, the bondholders shall have no authority to appoint a separate trustee to represent them.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-429.
Signatures on bonds [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

In the event that any of the members or officers of the board of directors of the corporation shall cease to be members or officers of the board prior to the delivery of any bonds signed by them, their signatures or facsimiles thereof shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such members or officers had remained in office until such delivery.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-431.
Establishment of funds and accounts [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

The corporation may create and establish such funds and accounts as may be necessary or desirable for its purposes under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-433.
Contracts with bondholders; securing of moneys held for payment of bonds [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

The corporation shall have the power to contract with the holders of any of its bonds issued under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 as to the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any money of the corporation, and of any money held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds, and to carry out such contract. Money held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds or in any way to secure bonds and deposits of money may be secured in the same manner as money of the corporation, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give security for the deposits.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-435.
Effect of amendments to Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 enacted after July 1, 1993 [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

Amendments to Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, enacted after July 1, 1993, shall not limit the rights vested in the corporation with respect to any agreements made with, or remedies available to, the holders of bonds issued under this article or Section 27-7-22.3 prior to the enactment of the amendments until the bonds, together with all interest thereon, and all costs and expenses in connection with any proceeding by or on behalf of the holders, are fully met and discharged.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-437.
Payment of expenses of corporation; limitation on liability [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

All expenses incurred by the corporation in carrying out the provisions of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall be payable solely from funds provided under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, or other funds of the corporation. Nothing in Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall be construed to authorize the corporation to incur indebtedness or liability on behalf of or payable by the state or any other political subdivision thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-439.
Exemption from taxation of income, profits, revenues, bonds, mortgages, deeds of trust and other agreements of corporation [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

The corporation is hereby declared to be performing a public function and to be a public body corporate and a political subdivision of the state. Accordingly, the income, including any profit made on the sale thereof from all bonds issued by the corporation, shall at all times be exempt from all taxation by the state or any political subdivision thereof. If, after all indebtedness and other obligations of the corporation are discharged, the corporation is dissolved, its remaining assets shall inure to the benefit of the state.

With the approval of the appropriate local taxing authority, all mortgages or deeds of trust executed as security therefor, all lease or purchase agreements made pursuant to the provisions hereof, and all purchases required to establish the industrial enterprise and financed by proceeds from bonds issued under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, shall likewise be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi except the contractors’ tax imposed by Section 27-65-21 and the tax levied by Section 27-65-24(1)(b), and except ad valorem taxes levied for school district purposes. All projects and the revenue derived therefrom from any lease thereof shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi, except the tax levied by Sections 27-65-21 and 27-65-24(1)(b), except the tax levied under Chapter 7, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, and except ad valorem taxes levied for school district purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 20; Laws, 1994, ch. 525, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 20; Laws, 2010, ch. 449, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-441.
Investment in bonds; bonds as security for deposits [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

The bonds issued by and under the authority of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 by the corporation are declared to be legal investments in which all public officers or public bodies of the state, its political subdivisions, all municipalities and municipal subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations, and other persons carrying on insurance business, all banks, bankers, banking associations, trust companies, savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons who are now or may later be authorized to invest in bonds or in other obligations of the state, may invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are also hereby made securities which may be deposited with and received by all public officers and bodies of the state or any agency or political subdivision of the state and all municipalities and public corporations for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the state is now or may be later authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-443.
Annual report of corporation [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

The corporation, within one hundred twenty (120) days of the close of each fiscal year, shall submit an annual report of its activities in regard to Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 for the preceding year to the Governor. The Clerk of the House of Representatives and the Secretary of the Senate each shall receive a copy of the report by making a request for it to the corporation. Each report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement in regard to Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 for the corporation during the fiscal year it covers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-445.
Construction of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

Nothing contained in Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 is to be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which the corporation might otherwise have under any other law of the state. Insofar as the provisions of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall be controlling, and the powers conferred by Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by any other laws. No proceedings, notice or approval shall be required for the issuance of any bonds or any instrument or the security therefor, except as provided in Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445.

The provisions of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445.

The powers granted and the duties imposed in Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall be construed to be independent and severable. If any one or more sections, subsections, sentences or parts of any of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall be adjudged unconstitutional or invalid, such adjudication shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remaining provisions thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the specific provisions so held unconstitutional or invalid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-447.
Deriving of pecuniary benefit or income by public official, member of Legislature, or partner or associate or family member of legislator.

No elected or appointed official shall derive any pecuniary benefit, directly or indirectly, as a result of such elected or appointed official’s duties under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445. Any member of the Legislature, any elected or appointed official, any member of the immediate family of a member of the Legislature, or any partner or associate of such a member of the Legislature or elected or appointed official, shall not derive any income from the issuance of any bonds under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, contrary to the provisions of Section 109, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, or Article 3, Chapter 4, Title 25, Mississippi Code of 1972. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any person performing clerical or administrative functions, which are other than legal services provided by an attorney, that are associated with the issuance of any bonds under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, such as the printing of bonds or other materials. Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one (1) year and not more than five (5) years and a fine of not less than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) and not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-449.
Repeal of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 and 27-7-22.3.

Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 and 27-7-22.3 shall be repealed from and after October 1, 2022.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 29; Laws, 1996, ch. 553, § 7; Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 26; Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 25; Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 25; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 25; Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 25; Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 25; Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 26; Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2017.